Missouri, session 2026, SB1214.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 455.050, 455.523, 565.076, 565.227,
and 571.070, RSMo, are repealed and five new sections enacted
in lieu thereof, to be known as sections 455.050, 455.523,
565.076, 565.227, and 571.070, to read as follows:
455.050. 1. Any full or ex parte order of protection
granted pursuant to sections 455.010 to 455.085 shall be to
protect the petitioner from domestic violence, stalking, or
sexual assault and may include such terms as the court
reasonably deems necessary to ensure the petitioner's
safety, including but not limited to:
(1) Temporarily enjoining the respondent from
committing or threatening to commit domestic violence,
molesting, stalking, sexual assault, or disturbing the peace
of the petitioner, including violence against a pet;
(2) Temporarily enjoining the respondent from entering
the premises of the dwelling unit of the petitioner when the
dwelling unit is:
(a) Jointly owned, leased or rented or jointly
occupied by both parties; or
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1214 2
(b) Owned, leased, rented or occupied by petitioner
individually; or
(c) Jointly owned, leased, rented or occupied by
petitioner and a person other than respondent; provided,
however, no spouse shall be denied relief pursuant to this
section by reason of the absence of a property interest in
the dwelling unit; or
(d) Jointly occupied by the petitioner and a person
other than respondent; provided that the respondent has no
property interest in the dwelling unit; or
(3) Temporarily enjoining the respondent from
communicating with the petitioner in any manner or through
any medium.
2. Mutual orders of protection are prohibited unless
both parties have properly filed written petitions and
proper service has been made in accordance with sections
455.010 to 455.085.
3. When the court has, after a hearing for any full
order of protection, issued an order of protection, it may,
in addition:
(1) Award custody of any minor child born to or
adopted by the parties when the court has jurisdiction over
such child and no prior order regarding custody is pending
or has been made, and the best interests of the child
require such order be issued;
(2) Establish a visitation schedule that is in the
best interests of the child;
(3) Award child support in accordance with supreme
court rule 88.01 and chapter 452;
(4) Award maintenance to petitioner when petitioner
and respondent are lawfully married in accordance with
chapter 452;

SB 1214 3
(5) Order respondent to make or to continue to make
rent or mortgage payments on a residence occupied by the
petitioner if the respondent is found to have a duty to
support the petitioner or other dependent household members;
(6) Order the respondent to pay the petitioner's rent
at a residence other than the one previously shared by the
parties if the respondent is found to have a duty to support
the petitioner and the petitioner requests alternative
housing;
(7) Order that the petitioner be given temporary
possession of specified personal property, such as
automobiles, checkbooks, keys, and other personal effects;
(8) Prohibit the respondent from transferring,
encumbering, or otherwise disposing of specified property
mutually owned or leased by the parties;
(9) Order the respondent to participate in a court-
approved counseling program designed to help batterers stop
violent behavior or to participate in a substance abuse
treatment program;
(10) Order the respondent to pay a reasonable fee for
housing and other services that have been provided or that
are being provided to the petitioner by a shelter for
victims of domestic violence;
(11) Order the respondent to pay court costs;
(12) Order the respondent to pay the cost of medical
treatment and services that have been provided or that are
being provided to the petitioner as a result of injuries
sustained to the petitioner by an act of domestic violence
committed by the respondent;
(13) Award possession and care of any pet, along with
any moneys necessary to cover medical costs that may have
resulted from abuse of the pet.

SB 1214 4
4. If the court issues, after a hearing for any full
order of protection, an order of protection, the court shall
also:
(1) Prohibit the respondent from knowingly possessing
or purchasing any firearm while the order is in effect;
(2) Inform the respondent of such prohibition in
writing and, if the respondent is present, orally; and
(3) Forward the order to the Missouri state highway
patrol so that the Missouri state highway patrol can update
the respondent's record in the National Instant Criminal
Background Check System (NICS). Upon receiving an order
under this subsection, the Missouri state highway patrol
shall notify the Federal Bureau of Investigation within
twenty-four hours.
5. A verified petition seeking orders for maintenance,
support, custody, visitation, payment of rent, payment of
monetary compensation, possession of personal property,
prohibiting the transfer, encumbrance, or disposal of
property, or payment for services of a shelter for victims
of domestic violence, shall contain allegations relating to
100 those orders and shall pray for the orders desired.
101 [5.] 6. In making an award of custody, the court shall
102 consider all relevant factors including the presumption that
103 the best interests of the child will be served by placing
104 the child in the custody and care of the nonabusive parent,
105 unless there is evidence that both parents have engaged in
106 abusive behavior, in which case the court shall not consider
107 this presumption but may appoint a guardian ad litem or a
108 court-appointed special advocate to represent the children
109 in accordance with chapter 452 and shall consider all other
110 factors in accordance with chapter 452.

SB 1214 5
111 [6.] 7. The court shall grant to the noncustodial
112 parent rights to visitation with any minor child born to or
113 adopted by the parties, unless the court finds, after
114 hearing, that visitation would endanger the child's physical
115 health, impair the child's emotional development or would
116 otherwise conflict with the best interests of the child, or
117 that no visitation can be arranged which would sufficiently
118 protect the custodial parent from further domestic
119 violence. The court may appoint a guardian ad litem or
120 court-appointed special advocate to represent the minor
121 child in accordance with chapter 452 whenever the custodial
122 parent alleges that visitation with the noncustodial parent
123 will damage the minor child.
124 [7.] 8. The court shall make an order requiring the
125 noncustodial party to pay an amount reasonable and necessary
126 for the support of any child to whom the party owes a duty
127 of support when no prior order of support is outstanding and
128 after all relevant factors have been considered, in
129 accordance with Missouri supreme court rule 88.01 and
130 chapter 452.
131 [8.] 9. The court may grant a maintenance order to a
132 party for a period of time, not to exceed one hundred eighty
133 days. Any maintenance ordered by the court shall be in
134 accordance with chapter 452.
135 [9.] 10. (1) The court may, in order to ensure that a
136 petitioner can maintain an existing wireless telephone
137 number or numbers, issue an order, after notice and an
138 opportunity to be heard, directing a wireless service
139 provider to transfer the billing responsibility for and
140 rights to the wireless telephone number or numbers to the
141 petitioner, if the petitioner is not the wireless service
142 accountholder.

SB 1214 6
143 (2) (a) The order transferring billing responsibility
144 for and rights to the wireless telephone number or numbers
145 to the petitioner shall list the name and billing telephone
146 number of the accountholder, the name and contact
147 information of the person to whom the telephone number or
148 numbers will be transferred, and each telephone number to be
149 transferred to that person. The court shall ensure that the
150 contact information of the petitioner is not provided to the
151 accountholder in proceedings held under this chapter.
152 (b) Upon issuance, a copy of the full order of
153 protection shall be transmitted, either electronically or by
154 certified mail, to the wireless service provider's
155 registered agent listed with the secretary of state, or
156 electronically to the email address provided by the wireless
157 service provider. Such transmittal shall constitute
158 adequate notice for the wireless service provider acting
159 under this section and section 455.523.
160 (c) If the wireless service provider cannot
161 operationally or technically effectuate the order due to
162 certain circumstances, the wireless service provider shall
163 notify the petitioner within three business days. Such
164 circumstances shall include, but not be limited to, the
165 following:
166 a. The accountholder has already terminated the
167 account;
168 b. The differences in network technology prevent the
169 functionality of a device on the network; or
170 c. There are geographic or other limitations on
171 network or service availability.
172 (3) (a) Upon transfer of billing responsibility for
173 and rights to a wireless telephone number or numbers to the
174 petitioner under this subsection by a wireless service

SB 1214 7
175 provider, the petitioner shall assume all financial
176 responsibility for the transferred wireless telephone number
177 or numbers, monthly service costs, and costs for any mobile
178 device associated with the wireless telephone number or
179 numbers.
180 (b) This section shall not preclude a wireless service
181 provider from applying any routine and customary
182 requirements for account establishment to the petitioner as
183 part of this transfer of billing responsibility for a
184 wireless telephone number or numbers and any devices
185 attached to that number or numbers including, but not
186 limited to, identification, financial information, and
187 customer preferences.
188 (4) This section shall not affect the ability of the
189 court to apportion the assets and debts of the parties as
190 provided for in law, or the ability to determine the
191 temporary use, possession, and control of personal property.
192 (5) No cause of action shall lie against any wireless
193 service provider, its officers, employees, or agents, for
194 actions taken in accordance with the terms of a court order
195 issued under this section.
196 (6) As used in this section and section 455.523, a
197 "wireless service provider" means a provider of commercial
198 mobile service under Section 332(d) of the federal
199 [Telecommunications] Communications Act of [1996] 1934 (47
200 U.S.C. Section [151, et seq.] 332).
455.523. 1. Any full order of protection granted
under sections 455.500 to 455.538 shall be to protect the
victim from domestic violence, including danger to the
child's pet, stalking, and sexual assault may include such
terms as the court reasonably deems necessary to ensure the
petitioner's safety, including but not limited to:

SB 1214 8
(1) Temporarily enjoining the respondent from
committing domestic violence or sexual assault, threatening
to commit domestic violence or sexual assault, stalking,
molesting, or disturbing the peace of the victim;
(2) Temporarily enjoining the respondent from entering
the family home of the victim, except as specifically
authorized by the court;
(3) Temporarily enjoining the respondent from
communicating with the victim in any manner or through any
medium, except as specifically authorized by the court.
2. If the court issues, after a hearing for any full
order of protection, an order of protection, the court shall
also:
(1) Prohibit the respondent from knowingly possessing
or purchasing any firearm while the order is in effect;
(2) Inform the respondent of such prohibition in
writing and, if the respondent is present, orally; and
(3) Forward the order to the Missouri state highway
patrol so that the Missouri state highway patrol can update
the respondent's record in the National Instant Criminal
Background Check System (NICS). Upon receiving an order
under this subsection, the Missouri state highway patrol
shall notify the Federal Bureau of Investigation within
twenty-four hours.
3. When the court has, after hearing for any full
order of protection, issued an order of protection, it may,
in addition:
(1) Award custody of any minor child born to or
adopted by the parties when the court has jurisdiction over
such child and no prior order regarding custody is pending
or has been made, and the best interests of the child
require such order be issued;

SB 1214 9
(2) Award visitation;
(3) Award child support in accordance with supreme
court rule 88.01 and chapter 452;
(4) Award maintenance to petitioner when petitioner
and respondent are lawfully married in accordance with
chapter 452;
(5) Order respondent to make or to continue to make
rent or mortgage payments on a residence occupied by the
victim if the respondent is found to have a duty to support
the victim or other dependent household members;
(6) Order the respondent to participate in a court-
approved counseling program designed to help stop violent
behavior or to treat substance abuse;
(7) Order the respondent to pay, to the extent that he
or she is able, the costs of his or her treatment, together
with the treatment costs incurred by the victim;
(8) Order the respondent to pay a reasonable fee for
housing and other services that have been provided or that
are being provided to the victim by a shelter for victims of
domestic violence;
(9) Order a wireless service provider, in accordance
with the process, provisions, and requirements set out in
subdivisions (1) to (6) of subsection [9] 10 of section
455.050, to transfer the billing responsibility for and
rights to the wireless telephone number or numbers of any
minor children in the petitioner's care to the petitioner,
if the petitioner is not the wireless service accountholder;
(10) Award possession and care of any pet, along with
any moneys necessary to cover medical costs that may have
resulted from abuse of the pet.
565.076. 1. A person commits the offense of domestic
assault in the fourth degree if the act involves a domestic

SB 1214 10
victim, as the term "domestic victim" is defined under
section 565.002, and:
(1) The person attempts to cause or recklessly causes
physical injury, physical pain, or illness to such domestic
victim;
(2) With criminal negligence the person causes
physical injury to such domestic victim by means of a deadly
weapon or dangerous instrument;
(3) The person purposely places such domestic victim
in apprehension of immediate physical injury by any means;
(4) The person recklessly engages in conduct which
creates a substantial risk of death or serious physical
injury to such domestic victim;
(5) The person knowingly causes physical contact with
such domestic victim knowing he or she will regard the
contact as offensive; or
(6) The person knowingly attempts to cause or causes
the isolation of such domestic victim by unreasonably and
substantially restricting or limiting his or her access to
other persons, telecommunication devices or transportation
for the purpose of isolation.
2. The offense of domestic assault in the fourth
degree is a class A misdemeanor, unless the person has
previously been found guilty of the offense of domestic
assault, of any assault offense under this chapter, or of
any offense against a domestic victim committed in violation
of any county or municipal ordinance in any state, any state
law, any federal law, or any military law which if committed
in this state two or more times would be a violation of this
section, in which case it is a class E felony. The offenses
described in this subsection may be against the same
domestic victim or against different domestic victims.

SB 1214 11
3. Upon a person's conviction for the offense of
domestic assault in the fourth degree, the court shall
forward the record of conviction to the Missouri state
highway patrol so that the Missouri state highway patrol can
update the offender's record in the National Instant
Criminal Background Check System (NICS). Upon receiving a
record under this subsection, the Missouri state highway
patrol shall notify the Federal Bureau of Investigation
within twenty-four hours.
565.227. 1. A person commits the offense of stalking
in the second degree if he or she purposely, through his or
her course of conduct, disturbs, or follows with the intent
to disturb another person.
2. This section shall not apply to activities of
federal, state, county, or municipal law enforcement
officers conducting investigations of any violation of
federal, state, county, or municipal law.
3. Any law enforcement officer may arrest, without a
warrant, any person he or she has probable cause to believe
has violated the provisions of this section.
4. The offense of stalking in the second degree is a
class A misdemeanor, unless the defendant has previously
been found guilty of a violation of this section or section
565.225, or of any offense committed in another jurisdiction
which, if committed in this state, would be chargeable or
indictable as a violation of any offense listed in this
section or section 565.225, or unless the victim is
intentionally targeted as a law enforcement officer, as
defined in section 556.061, or the victim is targeted
because he or she is a relative within the second degree of
consanguinity or affinity to a law enforcement officer, in
which case stalking in the second degree is a class E felony.

SB 1214 12
5. Upon a person's conviction for the offense of
stalking in the second degree, the court shall forward the
record of conviction to the Missouri state highway patrol so
that the Missouri state highway patrol can update the
offender's record in the National Instant Criminal
Background Check System (NICS). Upon receiving a record
under this subsection, the Missouri state highway patrol
shall notify the Federal Bureau of Investigation within
twenty-four hours.
571.070. 1. A person commits the offense of unlawful
possession of a firearm if such person knowingly has any
firearm in his or her possession and:
(1) Such person has been convicted of a felony under
the laws of this state, or of a crime under the laws of any
state or of the United States which, if committed within
this state, would be a felony; [or]
(2) Such person is a fugitive from justice, is
habitually in an intoxicated or drugged condition, or is
currently adjudged mentally incompetent;
(3) Such person has been convicted of a misdemeanor
offense of domestic violence under the laws of this state,
or of a crime under the laws of any state or of the United
States that if committed in this state would be a
misdemeanor offense of domestic violence; or
(4) Such person is subject to an order of protection
granted under sections 455.010 to 455.095 or sections
455.500 to 455.538 that was issued after a hearing of which
the person had actual notice and at which the person had an
opportunity to participate or such person is subject to an
equivalent order issued under the laws of another state or
the United States.

SB 1214 13
2. Unlawful possession of a firearm is a class C
felony, unless a person has been convicted of a dangerous
felony as defined in section 556.061, or the person has a
prior conviction for unlawful possession of a firearm in
which case it is a class B felony.
3. (1) Except as otherwise provided in this
subsection, the provisions of subdivision (1) of subsection
1 of this section shall not apply to the possession of an
antique firearm.
(2) The exception under subdivision (1) of this
subsection allowing for the possession of an antique firearm
shall not apply if the felony described under subdivision
(1) of subsection 1 of this section is a felony offense of
domestic violence.
4. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Family" or "household member", the same meaning
given to the terms in section 455.010;
(2) "Felony offense of domestic violence":
(a) Domestic assault in the first degree under section
565.072;
(b) Domestic assault in the second degree under
section 565.073;
(c) Domestic assault in the third degree under section
565.074;
(d) Stalking in the first degree under section
565.225; or
(e) Any felony offense committed by a family or
household member of the victim that involves the use or
attempted use of physical force or the threatened use of a
deadly weapon;
(3) "Misdemeanor offense of domestic violence":

SB 1214 14
(a) Domestic assault in the fourth degree under
section 565.076;
(b) Stalking in the second degree under section
565.227; or
(c) Any misdemeanor offense committed by a family or
household member of the victim that involves the use or
attempted use of physical force or the threatened use of a
deadly weapon.
✓